searchsrv/searchengine/oss/sb/snowball/algorithms/kraaij_pohlmann/stem_ISO_8859_1.sbl
/*

Copyright (c) 2001, Dr Martin Porter
Copyright (c) 2002, Richard Boulton
All rights reserved.

Redistribution and use in source and binary forms, with 
or without modification, are permitted provided that the 
following conditions are met:

*	Redistributions of source code must retain the 
	above copyright notice, this list of conditions and 
	the following disclaimer. 
*	Redistributions in binary form must reproduce 
	above copyright notice, this list of conditions and
 	the following disclaimer in the documentation and/or 
	other materials provided with the distribution. 
*	Neither the name of the <ORGANIZATION> nor the 
	names of its contributors may be used to endorse or 
	promote products derived from this software without
	specific rior written permission. 

THIS SOFTWARE IS PROVIDED BY THE COPYRIGHT HOLDERS AND 
CONTRIBUTORS "AS IS" AND ANY EXPRESS OR IMPLIED WARRANTIES, 
INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, THE IMPLIED WARRANTIES OF 
MERCHANTABILITY AND FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE ARE 
DISCLAIMED. IN NO EVENT SHALL THE COPYRIGHT OWNER OR 
CONTRIBUTORS BE LIABLE FOR ANY DIRECT, INDIRECT, INCIDENTAL, 
SPECIAL, EXEMPLARY, OR CONSEQUENTIAL DAMAGES (INCLUDING, 
BUT NOT LIMITED TO, PROCUREMENT OF SUBSTITUTE GOODS OR 
SERVICES; LOSS OF USE, DATA, OR PROFITS; OR BUSINESS 
INTERRUPTION) HOWEVER CAUSED AND ON ANY THEORY OF LIABILITY, 
WHETHER IN CONTRACT, STRICT LIABILITY, OR TORT (INCLUDING 
NEGLIGENCE OR OTHERWISE) ARISING IN ANY WAY OUT OF THE USE 
OF THIS SOFTWARE, EVEN IF ADVISED OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH 
DAMAGE.

*/

strings ( ch )
integers ( x p1 p2 )
booleans ( Y_found stemmed GE_removed )

routines (

   R1 R2
   C V VX
   lengthen_V
   Step_1 Step_2 Step_3 Step_4 Step_7
   Step_6 Step_1c
   Lose_prefix
   Lose_infix
   measure
)

externals ( stem )

groupings ( v v_WX AOU AIOU )

stringescapes {}

stringdef '   hex '27'  // yuk

define v        'aeiouy'
define v_WX     v + 'wx'
define AOU      'aou'
define AIOU     'aiou'

backwardmode (

    define R1 as (setmark x $x >= p1)
    define R2 as (setmark x $x >= p2)

    define V  as test (v or 'ij')
    define VX as test (next v or 'ij')
    define C  as test (not 'ij' non-v)

    define lengthen_V as do (
        non-v_WX [ (AOU] test (non-v or atlimit)) or
                   ('e'] test (non-v or atlimit
                               not AIOU
                               not (next AIOU non-v)))
        ->ch insert ch
    )

    define Step_1 as
    (
        [among ( (])

            '{'}s' (delete)
            's'    (R1 not ('t' R1) C delete)
            'ies'  (R1 <-'ie')
            'es'
                   (('ar' R1 C ] delete lengthen_V) or
                    ('er' R1 C ] delete) or
                    (R1 C <-'e'))

            'aus'  (R1 V <-'au')
            'en'   (('hed' R1 ] <-'heid') or
                    ('nd' delete) or
                    ('d' R1 C ] delete) or
                    ('i' or 'j' V delete) or
                    (R1 C delete lengthen_V))
            'nde'  (<-'nd')
        )
    )

    define Step_2 as
    (
        [among ( (])
            'je'   (('{'}t' ] delete) or
                    ('et'   ] R1 C delete) or
                    ('rnt'  ] <-'rn') or
                    ('t'    ] R1 VX delete) or
                    ('ink'  ] <-'ing') or
                    ('mp'   ] <-'m') or
                    ('{'}'  ] R1 delete) or
                    (] R1 C delete))
            'ge'   (R1 <-'g')
            'lijke'(R1 <-'lijk')
            'ische'(R1 <-'isch')
            'de'   (R1 C delete)
            'te'   (R1 <-'t')
            'se'   (R1 <-'s')
            're'   (R1 <-'r')
            'le'   (R1 delete attach 'l' lengthen_V)
            'ene'  (R1 C delete attach 'en' lengthen_V)
            'ieve' (R1 C <-'ief')
        )
    )

    define Step_3 as
    (
        [among ( (])
            'atie'  (R1 <-'eer')
            'iteit' (R1 delete lengthen_V)
            'heid'
            'sel'
            'ster'  (R1 delete)
            'rder'  (<-'r')
            'ing'
            'isme'
            'erij'  (R1 delete lengthen_V)
            'arij'  (R1 C <-'aar')
            'fie'   (R2 delete attach 'f' lengthen_V)
            'gie'   (R2 delete attach 'g' lengthen_V)
            'tst'   (R1 C <-'t')
            'dst'   (R1 C <-'d')
        )
    )

    define Step_4 as
    (
        (   [among ( (])
                'ioneel'  (R1 <-'ie')
                'atief'   (R1 <-'eer')
                'baar'    (R1 delete)
                'naar'    (R1 V <-'n')
                'laar'    (R1 V <-'l')
                'raar'    (R1 V <-'r')
                'tant'    (R1 <-'teer')
                'lijker'
                'lijkst'  (R1 <-'lijk')
                'achtig'
                'achtiger'
                'achtigst'(R1 delete)
                'eriger'
                'erigst'
                'erig'
                'end'     (R1 C delete lengthen_V)
            )
        )
        or
        (   [among ( (])
                'iger'
                'igst'
                'ig'      (R1 C delete lengthen_V)
            )
        )
    )

    define Step_7 as
    (
        [among ( (])
            'kt'   (<-'k')
            'ft'   (<-'f')
            'pt'   (<-'p')
        )
    )

    define Step_6 as
    (
        [among ( (])
            'bb'   (<-'b')
            'cc'   (<-'c')
            'dd'   (<-'d')
            'ff'   (<-'f')
            'gg'   (<-'g')
            'hh'   (<-'h')
            'jj'   (<-'j')
            'kk'   (<-'k')
            'll'   (<-'l')
            'mm'   (<-'m')
            'nn'   (<-'n')
            'pp'   (<-'p')
            'qq'   (<-'q')
            'rr'   (<-'r')
            'ss'   (<-'s')
            'tt'   (<-'t')
            'vv'   (<-'v')
            'ww'   (<-'w')
            'xx'   (<-'x')
            'zz'   (<-'z')
            'v'    (<-'f')
            'z'    (<-'s')
        )
    )

    define Step_1c as
    (
        [among ( (] R1 C)
            'd' (not ('n' R1) delete)
            't' (not ('h' R1) delete)
        )
    )
)

define Lose_prefix as (
    ['ge'] test hop 3 (goto v goto non-v)
    set GE_removed
    delete
)

define Lose_infix as (
    next
    gopast (['ge']) test hop 3 (goto v goto non-v)
    set GE_removed
    delete
)

define measure as (
    do (
        tolimit
        setmark p1
        setmark p2
    )
    do(
        repeat non-v  atleast 1 ('ij' or v)  non-v  setmark p1
        repeat non-v  atleast 1 ('ij' or v)  non-v  setmark p2
    )

)
define stem as (

    unset Y_found
    unset stemmed
    do ( ['y'] <-'Y' set Y_found )
    do repeat(goto (v  ['y'])<-'Y' set Y_found )

    measure

    backwards (
            do (Step_1 set stemmed )
            do (Step_2 set stemmed )
            do (Step_3 set stemmed )
            do (Step_4 set stemmed )
    )
    unset GE_removed
    do (Lose_prefix and measure)
    backwards (
            do (GE_removed Step_1c)
        )
    unset GE_removed
    do (Lose_infix and measure)
    backwards (
            do (GE_removed Step_1c)
        )
    backwards (
            do (Step_7 set stemmed )
            do (stemmed or GE_removed Step_6)
        )
    do(Y_found  repeat(goto (['Y']) <-'y'))
)
